Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.070

Hearing—Rules of procedure—Counsel.

(1) Procedures for the conduct of all hearings provided for in this chapter may be established by rule of the supreme court.

(2) Any person subject to proceedings under this chapter may be represented by counsel.

(3) The attorney representing the state, county, city, town, or agency authorized to issue an infraction as defined in RCW 7.84.020 may appear in any proceedings under this chapter but need not appear, notwithstanding any statute or rule of court to the contrary.

[ 2020 c 38 s 5; 1987 c 380 s 7.]